Oklahoma, session 2025, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3260 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “First


Responder Recruitment and Retention Act”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Degree program” means a program offered at an Oklahoma


educational institution that leads to the award of an associate’s


degree or a baccalaureate degree;


2. “Eligible student” means:

Req. No. 820 Page 1


a. a peace officer as defined by Section 648 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. a volunteer or a permanent salaried professional


member of any fire department in this state, and


c. a volunteer or employed emergency medical technician


who is licensed pursuant to Section 1-2505 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. “Oklahoma educational institution” means an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education; and


4. “Program” means the First Responder Recruitment and


Retention Program.


C. There is hereby created the First Responder Recruitment and


Retention Program to provide a waiver of resident tuition for


eligible students who meet the requirements of subsection D of this


section.


D. To be eligible to apply for the program, an eligible student


shall:


1. Have satisfied admission standards as determined by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for first-time entering


students for the appropriate type of institution;


2. Have secured admission to and enrolled in an Oklahoma


educational institution; and



Req. No. 820 Page 2


3. Pursue a degree program that relates to a career as a peace


officer as defined by Section 648 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, a salaried professional member of any fire department in


this state, or an employed emergency medical technician who is


licensed pursuant to Section 1-2505 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


E. An eligible student seeking a program tuition waiver shall


submit an application on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education. The application shall include:


1. A verification that the person applying meets the definition


of eligible student as provided for in subsection B of this section;


and


2. Proof that the individual is:


a. a peace officer as defined by Section 648 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. a volunteer or a permanent salaried professional


member of any fire department in this state, or


c. a volunteer or employed emergency medical technician


who is licensed pursuant to Section 1-2505 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. To retain eligibility for the program, a student shall:


1. Maintain good academic standing and satisfactory academic


progress according to standards of the Oklahoma educational


institution in which the eligible student is enrolled; and

Req. No. 820 Page 3


2. Maintain the requirements for retention and degree


completion as established by the Oklahoma educational institution in


which the eligible student is enrolled.


G. An eligible student may receive a program tuition waiver for


up to five (5) years or until completion of the degree program,


whichever occurs first.


H. Program tuition waivers awarded pursuant to this act shall


apply after all other state or federal assistance has been


exhausted.


I. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-820 EB 1/19/2025 5:39:08 AM













Req. No. 820 Page 4